Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1,131
Insurer; report to department; when.

A report made under section 38-1,129 or 38-1,130 shall be made within thirty days after the date of the violation, action, event, or request. Nothing in such sections shall be construed to require an insurer to report based on information gained due to the filing of a claim for payment under a health insurance policy by or on behalf of a person required to be credentialed whether or not such person is credentialed.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 131.